Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 30 Veterinarians

Cross references. —

As to licensing generally, see chapter 1 of this title.

As to state veterinarian, see chapter 18 of title 11.

As to admission of veterinarians from other states in event of disaster, see §

19-13-115

.

For Controlled Substances Act, see §

35-7-1001

et seq.

Stated

in

Paravecchio v. Memorial Hosp., 742 P.2d 1276,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 507

(Wyo. 1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

78 Am. Jur. 2d Veterinarians §§ 1 to 6.

70 C.J.S. Physicians and Surgeons §§ 11 to 34.